Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Article 6. Highway Maintenance and Operating Fund.

§ 33.2-1530.
Highway Maintenance and Operating Fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Highway Maintenance and Operating Fund ( the Fund). The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. Any moneys remaining in the Fund at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund.

The Fund shall consist of the following:

Revenues allocated pursuant to subdivision B 1 of §

33.2-1524

;

Revenues generated pursuant to §

33.2-213

;

Right-of-way use fees pursuant to § 56-484.32;

Civil penalties pursuant to §§

33.2-216

,

33.2-1224

,

33.2-1229

, 46.2-341.20:2, 46.2-1573, 46.2-1573.11, 46.2-1573.23, and 46.2-1573.36;

Permit fees as outlined in § 46.2-652.1;

Permit fees pursuant to §§ 46.2-1128, 46.2-1140.1, 46.2-1142.1, 46.2-1143, 46.2-1148, and 46.2-1149.1;

Applicable portions of emissions inspection fees from on-road emissions inspectors as designated in § 46.2-1182; and

Any other funds appropriated by the General Assembly.In any year in which the Board determines funding in excess of the amount provided pursuant to §

33.2-1524

is necessary for the Special Structure Program pursuant to §

33.2-374

, the Board shall allocate moneys from the Fund to the Special Structure Fund established pursuant to §

33.2-1532

.

History.

2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 684; 2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

Cross references.

As to requirement that Budget Bill include amounts diverted from Transportation Trust Fund and Highway Maintenance and Operating Fund, see §

2.2-1509.2

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2015, c. 684, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending
§§

33.2-200

,

33.2-1530

,

58.1-815.4

,

58.1-1741

, and

58.1-2289

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 2016.”

Acts
2015, c. 684, cl. 12, as amended by Acts
2018, cc. 854 and
856, cl. 18, provides: “That the provisions of this act amending
§§

33.2-1530

,

58.1-815.4

, and

58.1-2289

of the Code of Virginia shall expire if the Commonwealth collects sales and use tax from remote retailers on sales made into the Commonwealth pursuant to legislation enacted by the federal government that grants states that meet minimum simplification requirements specified in such legislation the authority to compel remote retailers to collect sales and use tax on sales made into the respective state.” Acts
2019, cc. 815 and
816, cl. 4 repealed Acts
2015, c. 684, cl. 12, as amended by Acts
2018, cc. 854 and
856, cl. 18. Acts
2019, c. 854, also repealed Acts
2015, c. 684, cl. 12, as amended.

Acts
2019, cc. 83 and
349, cl. 2 provides: “That the Commonwealth Transportation Board (the Board) shall undertake a comprehensive review of the current and future condition of pavements and bridges in the Commonwealth. This review shall at a minimum (i) consider current conditions and performance targets of pavements and bridges, (ii) consider current investment strategies of the Highway Maintenance and Operating Fund as well as the State of Good Repair Program, (iii) recommend new performance targets for pavements and bridges with sustainable performance over a 20-year period, and (iv) develop an investment strategy for the Highway Maintenance and Operating Fund and the State of Good Repair Program to achieve those sustainable performance targets, including a plan to address the funding needs of large and unique bridges and tunnel structures in the Commonwealth. The Board shall report no later than December 1, 2019, to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Transportation, the Joint Commission on Transportation Accountability, the House Committee on Appropriations, and the Senate Committee on Finance.”

Acts
2019, cc. 83 and
349, cl. 3 provides: “That the Commonwealth Transportation Board (the Board) shall, after July 1, 2020, and based on the review conducted by the Board pursuant to the second enactment of this act, dedicate a portion of funding from the Highway Maintenance and Operating Fund and the State of Good Repair Fund to the Robert O. Norris Bridge and Statewide Special Structure Fund, as created by this act.”

Acts
2019, cc. 83 and
349, cl. 4 provides: “That the Commonwealth Transportation Board shall evaluate the feasibility of using the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995 ( §

33.2-1800

et seq. of the Code of Virginia) to design, build, operate, and maintain two bridges to replace the existing Robert O. Norris Bridge on State Route 3 over the Rappahannock River between Lancaster and Middlesex Counties and the existing Downing Bridge on U.S. Route 360 over the Rappahannock River between the Town of Warsaw in Richmond County and the Town of Tappahannock in Essex County.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 684, effective July 1, 2016, deleted subdivision 10, which read: “Revenues from subdivision 2 of §

58.1-815.4

,” and redesignated former subdivisions 11 through 14 as 10 through 13. For expiration date, see note.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical, and rewrote the section.